Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.090

Excess charges—Contract void—Return of payments.

If a debt adjuster contracts for, receives or makes any charge in excess of the maximums permitted by this chapter, except as the result of an accidental and bona fide error, the debt adjuster's contract with the debtor shall be void and the debt adjuster shall return to the debtor the amount of all payments received from the debtor or on the debtor's behalf and not distributed to creditors.

[ 1999 c 151 s 103; 1967 c 201 s 9.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.